Washington statutes.
RCW 39.34.110

Powers otherwise prohibited by Constitutions or federal laws.

No power, privilege, or other authority shall be exercised under this chapter where prohibited by the state Constitution or the Constitution or laws of the federal government.

[ 1967 c 239 s 12.]